fst/foma/git_full_EW.foma
read lexc C:\Users\benja\OneDrive\Desktop\repos\sguuxs_splicer\fst\foma\git_full_EW.txt
define Lexicon ;

define Vowel a | e | i | o | u ;
define Consonant p | m | t | s | n | l | h | {hl} | k | x | w | y | ' | "_" ;
define CLetter b | d | j | g ;
define Obstruent p | t | k | k w | x | x w | s | t s | h l ;
define Sonorant m | n | l | w | y | {'m} | {'n} | {'l} | {'w} | {'y}  ;
define Sibilant s | {ts} | {ts'} ;
define InitialCons b | d | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | s | t | w | x | y ;
define VariationFlag "@P.VAR.HEHI@" | "@P.VAR.AE@" | "@P.VAR.GWIGU@" | "@P.VAR.XSKS@" | "@P.VAR.IMIX@" ;

!-- geminate big T between final vowel/sonorant and following consonant, it ends up as onset+nucleus
!-- extra morpheme break added so pre-V voicing works properly (but hacky)
define BigTDoubling T -> t "^" T || Vowel [m | n | l | w | y]* "^"* _ "^" Consonant ,,
                    T -> t "^" T || Vowel "^"* _ "^" Vowel ;

!--delete big T between a consonant and following -diit suffix
define TDiitDeletion    T -> 0 || Consonant "^"* _ {^i}* {^diit} ;

!--turn big T into V nucleus between consonants, elsewhere into t
define BigTForm T -> t || _ "^" Vowel ,,
                T -> t || Vowel "^"* _ "^" ,,
                T -> "^" i || Consonant "^"* _ "^" Consonant ;

!--turn all remaining big T in complete-final position into hypothetical (t)
define BigTElsewhere T -> "(t)" || _  ;

!--delete TR vowel before -diit suffix and after unstressed sonorant
define TrDeletion   {^i} -> 0 || _ {^diit}  ,,
                    {^i} -> 0 || [Consonant | InitialCons]+ "^"* [i|a] [n|l] _ ;

!--convert -xw suffix to -s after a non-glottal palatal or labiovelar (x, xw, k, kw)
!--optionally after a uvular (k_, x_)
define xwAfterVelar x w -> s || [ x | k ] w* "^" _ ,,
                    x w (->) s || [ x | k ] {_} "^" _ ;

!--epenthesize t between -xw/-in suffix and a vowel/sonorant
!--can't remember why you need a VV/VR sequence here...
define dintxwEpenthesis [..] -> t || Vowel [ Vowel | Sonorant ]* "^" _ x w ,,
                        [..] -> d || Vowel [ Vowel | Sonorant ]* "^" _ i n ;
                        ![..] -> d || Vowel [ Vowel | m | n | l | w | y ]* "^" _ i n ; ! if in fact we don't want t insertion here

!--delete vowel in -asxw suffix after a vowel/sonorant
define asxwForm a -> 0 || [ Vowel | Sonorant ] "^" _ s x w [ "^" | .#. ] ;

!--when series II -si'm follows a sibilant affricate/fricative, insert a vowel
define SimHiatus [..] -> i || Sibilant "^" _ {si'm} ;

!--delete a connective following an identical phoneme
define DoubleFricative  s -> 0 || Sibilant "^" _ ,,
                        {hl} -> 0 || {hl} "^" _ ;

!--vowel hiatus resolution vowel-initial suffixes/clitics
define GlideEpenthesis  [..] -> y || Vowel "^" _ i ,,
                        [..] -> h || Vowel "^" _ a [ "^" | .#. ] ;

!--delete the vowel in the -it SX suffix if it follows a vowel/plain sonorant
define VDeletion    i -> 0 || Vowel "^" _ t ,,
                    i (->) 0 || Vowel [m | n | l | w | y] "^" _ t ;

!--delete a schwa suffixed to an echo vowel
define DeleteAfterEchoVowel i -> 0 || e %' e "^" _ [ InitialCons | "^" | .#. ] ,,
                            i -> 0 || a %' a "^" _ [ InitialCons | "^" | .#. ] ,,
                            i -> 0 || o %' o "^" _ [ InitialCons | "^" | .#. ] ;

!--delete the echo vowel on a stem if a real vowel follows
define DeleteEchoVowel  e -> 0 || e %' _ "^" Vowel ,,
                        a -> 0 || a %' _ "^" Vowel ,,
                        o -> 0 || o %' _ "^" Vowel ;

!--insert a vowel if a sonorant suffix has been added after a consonant
define VInsertion   [..] -> i || Consonant "^" _ Sonorant ;

!--voice a non-glottalized stop (into voiced stop) if now followed by a vowel
define PreVVoicing  p -> b || _ "^"+ Vowel ,,
                    t -> d || _ "^"+ Vowel ,,
                    {ts} -> j || _ "^"+ Vowel ,,
                    k -> g || _ "^"+ Vowel ,,
                    X (->) g || _ "_" "^"+ Vowel ,,       ! optional hardening in algag_a'y
                    k -> g || _ [w | "_"] "^"+ Vowel ;

!--delete doubled 'y in e.g. didi'y-'y
define DoubleYDeletion  {'y} -> 0 || _ "^" {'y} ;

!--after R= proclitic, delete glottal stop, otherwise insert vowel, and n replaces d
define SIProclisis  %' -> 0 || .#. Sonorant "^" _ "$"* Vowel ,,
                    d i -> 0 || .#. Sonorant "^" _ m ,,
                    [..] -> i || .#. Sonorant "^" _ InitialCons ;


!--voice a dorsal fricative (into glide) if now followed by a vowel
define Gliding      x -> y || Vowel _ "^" Vowel ,,   ! parentheses around arrow??
                    x w (->) w || Vowel _ "^" Vowel ,,
                    X -> x ,,                     ! hopefully prevents algaXa'y -> algaha'y
                    {x_} (->) h || Vowel _ "^" Vowel ;

!--lower epenthesized vowel quality if added after a uvular or h
define VLowering    i -> a || [ h | "_" | {_'} ] "^" _ ;

!--round an epenthesized vowel if it is between labials, or after o + uvular
!--don't round non-epenthesized vowels or long vowels
define VRounding    i (->) u || [ w | {kw'} | Vowel m ] "^" _ '* m ,,
                    a (->) o || "$" o [ {k_} | {k_'} | {x_} ] "^" _ "^"* Consonant ;       ! standard or optional?

!--delete x fricative after stressed V-Sonorant before vowel (limx-it -> limit)
define VocalicRX    x -> 0 || "$" Vowel+ Sonorant _ "^" Vowel ;

!--hardening of unstressed ax_ when followed by V, e.g. algax_ / algag_a'y
define AxHardening  {x_} -> {X_} || Vowel [ Consonant | CLetter ]+ a _ "^" Vowel ;  ! special X

!--coalesce labiovelar offglide with following rounded vowel
!--must follow voicing/gliding process (else deletes w in xw -> y)
define OffglideDeletion w -> 0 || [ x | g | Vowel %' ] _ "^" u ,,
                        w -> 0 || k _ ' "^" u ;

!--stem variation rules that apply with active flags

!--allow optional excrescent vowel for Sonorant-X (limx -> limix)
define ExcrescentRX x (->) i x || Vowel Sonorant _ .#. ,,
                    {x_} (->) {ax_} || Vowel Sonorant _ .#. ;

!--optionally shorten/raise long vowel before an added sonorant coda
define VShortening e e (->) e || _ "^" Sonorant .#. ,,
                   o o (->) u || _ "^" Sonorant .#. ,,
                   a a (->) a || _ "^" Sonorant .#. ;

!--optionally convert short stressed a into e
define HeHiVariation e (->) i || h "$" _ [ Consonant | CLetter ] ;

!--optionally convert short stressed a into e
!--no conversion before or after a hard consonant with underscore
define AEVariation  a (->) e || [ InitialCons | InitialCons %' ] "$" _ [ "^" | .#. ] ,,
                    a (->) e || [ InitialCons | InitialCons %' ] "$" _ InitialCons [ InitialCons | "^" | .#. ] ;

!--optionally convert between gu/gwi, k'u/kw'i
define GwiGuVariation   {gwi} (->) {gu} || _ [ Consonant | CLetter ] ,,
                        {kw'i} (->) {k'u} || _ [ Consonant | CLetter ] ,,
                        {gw$i} (->) {g$u} || _ [ Consonant | CLetter | .#. | "^" ] ,,
                        {kw'$i} (->) {k'$u} || _ [ Consonant | CLetter | .#. | "^" ] ;

!--optionally convert between ks and xs sequence
define XsFortition  x s (->) k s || [ .#. | m | n | l | Vowel ] VariationFlag* _ ,,
                    x s (->) k s  || _ Vowel ,,             ! unstressed syllable
                    x w s (->) k w s  || .#. _ ,,
                    x (->) k || Vowel VariationFlag* _ "^" x w ;
define KsLenition   k s (->) x s || [ .#. | i | e | Vowel Vowel ] VariationFlag* _ ,,
                    k s (->) x s || Vowel [ m | n | l ] VariationFlag* _ ,,
                    k w s (->) x w s ;
    ! need to add a flag here


regex Lexicon ;
define Stems ;

! stem variation
set flag-is-epsilon OFF

regex Stems
    .o. HeHiVariation 
    .o. XsFortition 
    .o. KsLenition
    .o. AEVariation
    .o. GwiGuVariation
    .o. ExcrescentRX
    ;
twosided flag-diacritics
define VariableStems ;
regex VariableStems.i
    ! turned off the flag output for now
!    .o. [..] -> "<HEHI>" || .#. _ ?* "@P.VAR.HEHI@"
!    .o. [..] -> "<AE>" || .#. _ ?* "@P.VAR.AE@"
!    .o. [..] -> "<GWIGU>" || .#. _ ?* "@P.VAR.GWIGU@"
!    .o. [..] -> "<XSKS>" || .#. _ ?* "@P.VAR.XSKS@"
!    .o. [..] -> "<IMIX>" || .#. _ ?* "@P.VAR.IMIX@"
    ;
define VariableStems ;
read regex VariableStems.i ;
define Stems ;
! end stem variation

set flag-is-epsilon ON
regex Stems
    .o. TrDeletion
    .o. BigTDoubling
    .o. TDiitDeletion
    .o. BigTForm
    .o. BigTElsewhere
    .o. xwAfterVelar
    .o. dintxwEpenthesis
    .o. asxwForm
    .o. VDeletion
    .o. DeleteAfterEchoVowel
    .o. DeleteEchoVowel
    .o. DoubleYDeletion
    .o. GlideEpenthesis
    .o. SimHiatus
    .o. DoubleFricative
    .o. SIProclisis
    .o. VInsertion
    .o. VLowering
    .o. VRounding
    !.o. VShortening
    .o. VocalicRX
    .o. AxHardening
    .o. PreVVoicing
    .o. Gliding
    .o. OffglideDeletion
    ;
define MessyWords ;

!--delete stress marking
define DeleteStress  "$" -> 0 ;

!--delete predictable word-initial glottal stop before vowel
define InitialGlottal   %' -> 0 || .#. _ Vowel ;

!--delete morpheme boundaries from surface form
define Cleanup  "^" | "=" | "~" -> 0 ;

regex MessyWords
    .o. DeleteStress
    .o. InitialGlottal
    .o. Cleanup
;

define CleanWords ;
read regex CleanWords ;

save stack C:\Users\benja\OneDrive\Desktop\repos\sguuxs_splicer\fst\foma\git_full_EW.fomabin
